North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 5. Procedures for Admission and Discharge of Clients.
§ 122C-263.1.
Secretary’s authority to certify commitment examiners; training of certified commitment examiners performing first examinations.

Physicians and eligible psychologists are qualified to perform the commitment examinations required under

G.S. 122C-263

(c) and

G.S. 122C-283

(c). The Secretary of Health and Human Services may individually certify to perform the first commitment examinations required by

G.S. 122C-261

through

G.S. 122C-263

and

G.S. 122C-281

through

G.S. 122C-283

other health, mental health, and substance abuse professionals whose scope of practice includes diagnosing and documenting psychiatric or substance use disorders and conducting mental status examinations to determine capacity to give informed consent to treatment as follows:

The Secretary has received a request:

To certify a licensed clinical social worker, a master’s or higher level degree nurse practitioner, a licensed clinical mental health counselor, a licensed marriage and family therapist, or a physician assistant to conduct the first examinations described in G.S. 122C-263(c) and G.S. 122C-283(c).

To certify a master’s level licensed clinical addictions specialist to conduct the first examination described in G.S. 122C-283(c).

The Secretary shall review the request and may approve it upon finding all of the following:

The request meets the requirements of this section.

, c.Repealed by Session Laws 2018-33, s. 25, effective October 1, 2019.

d.

The Department determines that the applicant possesses the professional licensure, registration, or certification to qualify the applicant as a professional whose scope of practice includes diagnosing and documenting psychiatric or substance use disorders and conducting mental status examinations to determine capacity to give informed consent to treatment.

e.

The applicant for certification has successfully completed the Department’s standardized training program for involuntary commitment and has successfully passed the examination for that program.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-33, s. 25, effective October 1, 2019.

A certification granted by the Secretary under this section shall be in effect for a period of up to three years and may be rescinded at any time within this period if the Secretary finds the certified individual has failed to meet the requirements of this section. Certification may be renewed every three years upon completion of a refresher training program approved by the Department.

In no event shall the certification of a licensed clinical social worker, master’s or higher level degree nurse practitioner, licensed clinical mental health counsellor, a licensed marriage and family therapist, physician assistant, or master’s level certified clinical addictions specialist under this section be construed as authorization to expand the scope of practice of the licensed clinical social worker, the master’s level nurse practitioner, licensed clinical mental health counselor, a licensed marriage and family therapist, physician assistant, or the master’s level certified clinical addictions specialist.

The Department shall require that individuals certified to perform initial examinations under this section have successfully completed the Department’s standardized involuntary commitment training program and examination. The Department shall maintain a list of these individuals on its Internet Web site.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-33, s. 25, effective October 1, 2019.

(7a)

No less than annually, the Department shall submit a list of certified first commitment examiners to the Chief District Court Judge of each judicial district in North Carolina and maintain a current list of certified first commitment examiners on its Internet Web site.

A master’s level licensed clinical addiction specialist shall only be authorized to conduct the initial examination of individuals meeting the criteria of

G.S. 122C-281

(a).

A licensed marriage and family therapist shall not be authorized to conduct the initial examination of an individual married to a patient of the licensed marriage and family therapist.

The Department shall expand its standardized certification training program to include refresher training for all certified providers performing initial examinations pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History.

2011-346, s. 1; 2018-33, s. 25; 2019-240, ss. 3(i), 26(h); 2020-82, s. 2(a).

§ 122C-263.2.
Mental health crisis management: reasonable safety and containment measures.

An acute care hospital licensed under Chapter 131E, a department thereof, or other site of first examination that that uses reasonable safety or containment measures and precautions to manage the population of patients being held under appropriate supervision pending involuntary commitment placement and that does not otherwise operate as a licensable mental health facility shall not be deemed to be acting as a 24-hour facility; operating a psychiatric, substance abuse, or special care unit; offering psychiatric or substance abuse services; or acting as a licensed or unlicensed mental health facility. Actions considered to be reasonable safety or containment measures and precautions shall include the following: (i) altering rooms or removing items to prevent injury; (ii) placing patients in a consolidated location of the hospital; (iii) improvements to security and protection of staff; and (iv) any other reasonable measures that do not violate applicable law.

Reasonable safety or containment measures and precautions shall not be considered a violation of rules regulating acute care hospitals or mental health facilities. Placing patients in a consolidated location of the hospital pursuant to this subsection shall not constitute a special care unit. Nothing in this subsection relieves an acute care hospital or other site of first examination from complying with all other applicable laws or rules.

History.

2012-128, s. 1.

§ 122C-264.
Duties of clerk of superior court and the district attorney.

Upon receipt of a commitment examiner’s finding that the respondent meets the criteria of G.S. 122C-263(d)(1) and that outpatient commitment is recommended, the clerk of superior court of the county where the petition was initiated, upon direction of a district court judge, shall calendar the matter for hearing and shall notify the respondent, the proposed outpatient treatment physician or center, and the petitioner of the time and place of the hearing. The petitioner may file a written waiver of his right to notice under this subsection with the clerk of court.

Upon receipt by the clerk of superior court pursuant to G.S. 122C-266(c) of a commitment examiner’s finding that a respondent meets the criteria of G.S. 122C-263(d)(2) and that inpatient commitment is recommended, the clerk of superior court of the county where the 24-hour facility is located shall, after determination required by

G.S. 122C-261(c)

and upon direction of a district court judge, assign counsel if necessary, calendar the matter for hearing, and notify the respondent, his counsel, and the petitioner of the time and place of the hearing. The petitioner or respondent, directly or through counsel, may file a written waiver of the right to notice under this subsection with the clerk of court.

(b1)

Upon receipt of a commitment examiner’s certificate that a respondent meets the criteria of

G.S. 122C-261(a)

and that immediate hospitalization is needed pursuant to

G.S. 122C-262

, the clerk of superior court of the county where the treatment facility is located shall submit the certificate to the Chief District Court Judge. The court shall review the certificate within 24 hours, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and holidays, for a finding of reasonable grounds in accordance with [G.S.] 122C-261(b). The clerk shall notify the treatment facility of the court’s findings by telephone and shall proceed as set forth in subsections (b), (c), and (f) of this section.

Notice to the respondent, required by subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall be given as provided in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j) at least 72 hours before the hearing. Notice to other individuals shall be sent at least 72 hours before the hearing by first-class mail postage prepaid to the individual’s last known address.

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 6 shall not apply.

In cases described in G.S. 122C-266(b) in addition to notice required in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the clerk of superior court shall notify the chief district judge and the district attorney in the county in which the defendant was found incapable of proceeding. The notice shall be given in the same way as the notice required by subsection (c) of this section. The judge or the district attorney may file a written waiver of his right to notice under this subsection with the clerk of court.

(d1)

For hearings and rehearings pursuant to

G.S. 122C-268.1

and

G.S. 122C-276.1

, the clerk of superior court shall calendar the hearing or rehearing and shall notify the respondent, his counsel, counsel for the State, and the district attorney involved in the original trial. The notice shall be given in the same manner as the notice required by subsection (c) of this section.
Upon receipt of the notice, the district attorney shall notify any persons he deems appropriate, including anyone who has filed with his office a written request for notification of any hearing or rehearing concerning discharge or conditional release of a respondent. Notice sent by the district attorney shall be by first-class mail to the person’s last known address.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-158, s. 21, effective July 21, 2017.

The clerk of superior court of the county where inpatient commitment hearings and rehearings are held shall provide all notices, send all records and maintain a record of all proceedings as required by this Part; provided that if the respondent has been committed to a 24-hour facility in a county other than his county of residence and the district court hearing is held in the county of the facility, the clerk of superior court in the county of the facility shall forward the record of the proceedings to the clerk of superior court in the county of respondent’s residence, where they shall be maintained by receiving clerk.

History.

1973, c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 5; c. 414, s. 1; 1979, c. 915, s. 5; 1983, c. 380, s. 9; c. 638, ss. 8, 16; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 7; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 19; 1987, c. 596, s. 2; 1991, c. 37, s. 4; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 739, s. 9; 2017-158, s. 21; 2018-33, s. 26.

§ 122C-265.
Outpatient commitment; examination and treatment pending hearing.

If a respondent, who has been recommended for outpatient commitment by [a] commitment examiner different from the proposed outpatient treatment physician or center, fails to appear for examination by the proposed outpatient treatment physician or center at the designated time, the physician or center shall notify the clerk of superior court who shall issue an order to a law enforcement officer to take the respondent into custody and take him immediately to the outpatient treatment physician or center for evaluation. The custody order is valid throughout the State. The law-enforcement officer may wait during the examination and return the respondent to his home after the examination.

The examining commitment examiner or the proposed outpatient treatment physician or center may prescribe to the respondent reasonable and appropriate medication and treatment that are consistent with accepted medical standards pending the district court hearing.

In no event may a respondent released on a recommendation that he or she meets the outpatient commitment criteria be physically forced to take medication or forcibly detained for treatment pending a district court hearing.

If at any time pending the district court hearing the outpatient treatment physician or center determines that the respondent does not meet the criteria of G.S. 122C-263(d)(1), the physician shall release the respondent and notify the clerk of court and the proceedings shall be terminated.

If a respondent becomes dangerous to self as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

a., or others, as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

b., pending a district court hearing on outpatient commitment, new proceedings for involuntary inpatient commitment may be initiated.

If an inpatient commitment proceeding is initiated pending the hearing for outpatient commitment and the respondent is admitted to a 24-hour facility to be held for an inpatient commitment hearing, notice shall be sent by the clerk of court in the county where the respondent is being held to the clerk of court of the county where the outpatient commitment was initiated and the outpatient commitment proceeding shall be terminated.

History.

1983, c. 638, s. 11; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 6; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 823, s. 5; 1991, c. 636, s. 2(2); c. 761, s. 49; 2004-23, s. 2(a); 2018-33, s. 27.

§ 122C-266.
Inpatient commitment; second examination and treatment pending hearing.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (e), within 24 hours of arrival at a 24-hour facility described in

G.S. 122C-252

, the respondent shall be examined by a physician. This physician shall not be the same physician who completed the certificate or examination under the provisions of

G.S. 122C-262

or

G.S. 122C-263

. The examination shall include but is not limited to the assessment specified in

G.S. 122C-263

(c).

If the physician finds that the respondent is mentally ill and is dangerous to self, as defined by

G.S. 122C-3(11)

a., or others, as defined by

G.S. 122C-3(11)

b., the physician shall hold the respondent at the facility pending the district court hearing.

If the physician finds that the respondent meets the criteria for outpatient commitment under G.S. 122C-263(d)(1), the physician shall show these findings on the physician’s examination report, release the respondent pending the district court hearing, and notify the clerk of superior court of the county where the petition was initiated of these findings. In addition, the examining physician shall show on the examination report the name, address, and telephone number of the proposed outpatient treatment physician or center. The physician shall give the respondent a written notice listing the name, address, and telephone number of the proposed outpatient treatment physician or center and directing the respondent to appear at that address at a specified date and time. The examining physician before the appointment shall notify by telephone and shall send a copy of the notice and the examination report to the proposed outpatient treatment physician or center.

If the physician finds that the respondent does not meet the criteria for commitment under either G.S. 122C-263(d)(1) or G.S. 122C-263(d)(2), the physician shall release the respondent and the proceedings shall be terminated.

If the respondent is released under subdivisions (2) or (3) of this subsection, the law enforcement officer or other person designated to provide transportation shall return the respondent to the respondent’s residence in the originating county or, if requested by the respondent, to another location in the originating county.

(a1)

The second examination of a respondent required by subsection (a) of this section to determine whether the respondent will be involuntarily committed due to mental illness may be conducted either in the physical face-to-face presence of a physician or utilizing telehealth equipment and procedures, provided that the physician who examines the respondent by means of telehealth is satisfied to a reasonable medical certainty that the determinations made in accordance with subdivisions (a)(1) through (a)(3) of this section would not be different if the examination had been done in the physical presence of the examining physician. An examining physician who is not so satisfied shall note that the examination was not satisfactorily accomplished, and the respondent shall be taken for a face-to-face examination in the physical presence of a physician. As used in this section, “telehealth” means the use of two-way, real-time interactive audio and video where the respondent and commitment examiner can hear and see each other.

If the custody order states that the respondent was charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving assault with a deadly weapon, and that he was found incapable of proceeding, the physician shall examine him as set forth in subsection (a) of this section. However, the physician may not release him from the facility until ordered to do so following the district court hearing.

The findings of the physician and the facts on which they are based shall be in writing, in all cases. A copy of the findings shall be sent to the clerk of superior court by reliable and expeditious means.

Pending the district court hearing, the physician attending the respondent may administer to the respondent reasonable and appropriate medication and treatment that is consistent with accepted medical standards. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, if at any time pending the district court hearing, the attending physician determines that the respondent no longer meets the criteria of either G.S. 122C-263(d)(1) or (d)(2), he shall release the respondent and notify the clerk of court and the proceedings shall be terminated.

If the 24-hour facility described in

G.S. 122C-252

or

G.S. 122C-262

is the facility in which the first examination by a physician or eligible psychologist occurred and is the same facility in which the respondent is held, the second examination shall occur not later than the following regular working day.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 6; 1979, c. 915, s. 6; 1983, c. 380, s. 5; c. 638, ss. 9, 10; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 2; 1987, c. 596, s. 4; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 823, s. 6; 1991, c. 37, s. 9; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 739, s. 10(a), (b); 2021-77, s. 6(b).

§ 122C-267.
Outpatient commitment; district court hearing.

A hearing shall be held in district court within 10 days of the day the respondent is taken into custody pursuant to

G.S. 122C-261(e)

. Upon its own motion or upon motion of the proposed outpatient treatment physician or the respondent, the court may grant a continuance of not more than five days.

The respondent shall be present at the hearing. A subpoena may be issued to compel the respondent’s presence at a hearing. The petitioner and the proposed outpatient treatment physician or his designee may be present and may provide testimony.

Certified copies of reports and findings of commitment examiners and medical records of previous and current treatment are admissible in evidence.

At the hearing to determine the necessity and appropriateness of outpatient commitment, the respondent need not, but may, be represented by counsel. However, if the court determines that the legal or factual issues raised are of such complexity that the assistance of counsel is necessary for an adequate presentation of the merits or that the respondent is unable to speak for himself, the court may continue the case for not more than five days and order the appointment of counsel for an indigent respondent. Appointment of counsel shall be in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

Hearings may be held at the area facility in which the respondent is being treated, if it is located within the judge’s district court district as defined in

G.S. 7A-133

, or in the judge’s chambers. A hearing may not be held in a regular courtroom, over objection of the respondent, if in the discretion of a judge a more suitable place is available.

The hearing shall be closed to the public unless the respondent requests otherwise.

A copy of all documents admitted into evidence and a transcript of the proceedings shall be furnished to the respondent on request by the clerk upon the direction of a district court judge. If the client is indigent, the copies shall be provided at State expense.

To support an outpatient commitment order, the court is required to find by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the respondent meets the criteria specified in G.S. 122C-263(d)(1). The court shall record the facts which support its findings and shall show on the order the center or physician who is responsible for the management and supervision of the respondent’s outpatient commitment.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1975, cc. 322, 459; 1977, c. 400, s. 7; c. 1126, s. 1; 1979, c. 915, ss. 7, 13; 1983, c. 380, s. 6; c. 638, ss. 12, 13; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 8; 1987, c. 282, s. 18; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 113.1; 2000-144, s. 38; 2018-33, s. 28.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B.

§ 122C-268.
Inpatient commitment; district court hearing.

A hearing shall be held in district court within 10 days of the day the respondent is taken into law enforcement custody pursuant to

G.S. 122C-261(e)

or

G.S. 122C-262

. If a respondent temporarily detained under G.S. 122C-263(d)(2) is subject to a series of successive custody orders issued pursuant to G.S. 122C-263(d)(2), the hearing shall be held within 10 days after the day that the respondent is taken into custody under the most recent custody order. A continuance of not more than five days may be granted upon motion of any of the following:

The court.

Respondent’s counsel.

The State, sufficiently in advance to avoid movement of the respondent.

The attorney, who is a member of the staff of the Attorney General assigned to one of the State’s facilities for the mentally ill or the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill, shall represent the State’s interest at commitment hearings, rehearings, and supplemental hearings held for respondents admitted pursuant to this Part or

G.S. 15A-1321

at the facility to which he is assigned.In addition, the Attorney General may, in his discretion, designate an attorney who is a member of his staff to represent the State’s interest at any commitment hearing, rehearing, or supplemental hearing held in a place other than at one of the State’s facilities for the mentally ill or the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill.

If the respondent’s custody order indicates that he was charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, and that he was found incapable of proceeding, the clerk shall give notice of the time and place of the hearing as provided in G.S. 122C-264(d). The district attorney in the county in which the respondent was found incapable of proceeding may represent the State’s interest at the hearing.

The respondent shall be represented by counsel of his choice; or if he is indigent within the meaning of

G.S. 7A-450

or refuses to retain counsel if financially able to do so, he shall be represented by counsel appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

With the consent of the court, counsel may in writing waive the presence of the respondent.

Certified copies of reports and findings of commitment examiners and previous and current medical records are admissible in evidence, but the respondent’s right to confront and cross-examine witnesses may not be denied.

To the extent feasible, hearings shall be held in an appropriate room at the facility in which the respondent is being treated in a manner approved by the chief district court judge if the facility is located within the presiding judge’s district court district as defined in

G.S. 7A-133

. Hearings may be held in the judge’s chambers. A hearing may not be held in a regular courtroom, over objection of the respondent, if in the discretion of a judge a more suitable place is available. Regardless of the manner and location for hearings, hearings shall be held in a manner that complies with any applicable federal and State laws governing the confidentiality and security of confidential information. If the respondent has counsel, the respondent shall be allowed to communicate fully and confidentially with his attorney during the proceeding.

The hearing shall be closed to the public unless the respondent requests otherwise.

A copy of all documents admitted into evidence and a transcript of the proceedings shall be furnished to the respondent on request by the clerk upon the direction of a district court judge. If the respondent is indigent, the copies shall be provided at State expense.

To support an inpatient commitment order, the court shall find by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the respondent is mentally ill and dangerous to self, as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

a., or dangerous to others, as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

b. The court shall record the facts that support its findings.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 8; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 195(b); 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 114; 1989, c. 141, s. 11; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 823, s. 7; 1991, c. 37, s. 10; c. 257, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 739, s. 11(a), (b); 2000-144, s. 39; 2014-107, s. 6.1; 2017-158, s. 16; 2018-33, s. 29; 2021-47, s. 10(l).

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B.

§ 122C-268.1.
Inpatient commitment; hearing following automatic commitment.

A respondent who is committed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1321

shall be provided a hearing, unless waived, before the expiration of 50 days from the date of his commitment.

The district attorney in the county in which the respondent was found not guilty by reason of insanity may represent the State’s interest at the hearing, rehearings, and supplemental rehearings. Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 122C-269

, if the district attorney elects to represent the State’s interest, upon motion of the district attorney, the venue for the hearing, rehearings, and supplemental rehearings shall be the county in which the respondent was found not guilty by reason of insanity. If the district attorney declines to represent the State’s interest, then the representation shall be determined as follows. An attorney, who is a member of the staff of the Attorney General assigned to one of the State’s facilities for the mentally ill or the psychiatric service of the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill, may represent the State’s interest at commitment hearings, rehearings, and supplemental hearings. Alternatively, the Attorney General may, in his discretion, designate an attorney who is a member of his staff to represent the State’s interest at any commitment hearing, rehearing, or supplemental hearing.

The clerk shall give notice of the time and place of the hearing as provided in G.S. 122C-264(d1).

The respondent shall be represented by counsel of his choice, or if he is indigent within the meaning of

G.S. 7A-450

or refuses to retain counsel if financially able to do so, he shall be represented by counsel appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

With the consent of the court, counsel may in writing waive the presence of the respondent.

Certified copies of reports and findings of physicians and psychologists and previous and current medical records are admissible in evidence, but the respondent’s right to confront and cross-examine witnesses may not be denied.

The hearing shall take place in the trial division in which the original trial was held. The hearing shall be open to the public. For purposes of this subsection, “trial division” means either the superior court division or the district court division of the General Court of Justice.

A copy of all documents admitted into evidence and a transcript of the proceedings shall be furnished to the respondent on request by the clerk upon the direction of the presiding judge. If the respondent is indigent, the copies shall be provided at State expense.

The respondent shall bear the burden to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that he (i) no longer has a mental illness as defined in G.S. 122C-3(21), or (ii) is no longer dangerous to others as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

b. If the court is so satisfied, then the court shall order the respondent discharged and released. If the court finds that the respondent has not met his burden of proof, then the court shall order that inpatient commitment continue at a 24-hour facility designated pursuant to

G.S. 122C-252

for a period not to exceed 90 days. The court shall make a written record of the facts that support its findings.

Nothing in this section shall limit the respondent’s right to habeas corpus relief.

History.

1991, c. 37, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1034, ss. 2, 3; 1995, c. 140, s. 1; 2000-144, s. 40.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Senate Bill 43: A Refinement of North Carolina’s Involuntary Civil Commitment Procedures,” see 14 Campbell L. Rev. 105 (1992).

§ 122C-269.
Venue of hearing when respondent held at a 24-hour facility pending hearing.

In all cases where the respondent is held at a 24-hour facility pending hearing as provided in

G.S. 122C-268

,

G.S. 122C-268

.1, 122C-276.1, or 122C-277(b1), unless the respondent through counsel objects to the venue, the hearing shall be held in the county in which the facility is located. Upon objection to venue, the hearing shall be held in the county where the petition was initiated, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section.

An official of the facility shall immediately notify the clerk of superior court of the county in which the facility is located of a determination to hold the respondent pending hearing. That clerk shall request transmittal of all documents pertinent to the proceedings from the clerk of superior court where the proceedings were initiated. The requesting clerk shall assume all duties set forth in

G.S. 122C-264

. The counsel provided for in G.S. 122C-268(d) shall be appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

Upon motion of any interested person, the venue of an initial hearing described in G.S. 122C-268(c) or

G.S. 122C-268.1

or a rehearing required by G.S. 122C-276(b),

G.S. 122C-276.1

, or subsections (b) or (b1) of

G.S. 122C-277

shall be moved to the county in which the respondent was found not guilty by reason of insanity or incapable of proceeding when the convenience of witnesses and the ends of justice would be promoted by the change.

History.

1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 133; 1981, c. 537, s. 6; 1983, c. 380, s. 7; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1991, c. 37, ss. 11, 12; 1995, c. 140, s. 2; 2000-144, s. 41; 2001-487, s. 29.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B.

§ 122C-270.
Attorneys to represent the respondent and the State.

In a superior court district or set of districts as defined in

G.S. 7A-41.1

in which a State facility for the mentally ill is located, the Commission on Indigent Defense Services shall appoint an attorney licensed to practice in North Carolina as special counsel for indigent respondents who are mentally ill. These special counsel shall serve at the pleasure of the Commission, may not privately practice law, and shall receive annual compensation within the salary range for assistant public defenders as fixed by the Office of Indigent Defense Services. The special counsel shall represent all indigent respondents at all hearings, rehearings, and supplemental hearings held at the State facility. Special counsel shall determine indigency in accordance with G.S. 7A-450(a). Indigency is subject to redetermination by the presiding judge. If the respondent appeals, counsel for the appeal shall be appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

The State facility shall provide suitable office space for the counsel to meet privately with respondents. The Office of Indigent Defense Services shall provide secretarial and clerical service and necessary equipment and supplies for the office.

In the event of a vacancy in the office of special counsel, counsel’s incapacity, or a conflict of interest, counsel for indigents at hearings or rehearings may be assigned in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services. No mileage or compensation for travel time is paid to a counsel appointed pursuant to this subsection. Counsel may also be so assigned when, in the opinion of the Director of the Office of Indigent Defense Services, the volume of cases warrants.

At hearings held in counties other than those designated in subsection (a) of this section, counsel for indigent respondents shall be appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

If the respondent is committed to a non-State 24-hour facility, assigned counsel remains responsible for the respondent’s representation at the trial level until discharged by order of district court, until the respondent is unconditionally discharged from the facility, or until the respondent voluntarily admits himself or herself to the facility. If the respondent is transferred to a State facility for the mentally ill, assigned counsel is discharged. If the respondent appeals, counsel for the appeal shall be appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

The Attorney General may employ four attorneys, one to be assigned by him full-time to each of the State facilities for the mentally ill, to represent the State’s interest at commitment hearings, rehearings and supplemental hearings held under this Article at the State facilities for respondents admitted to those facilities pursuant to Part 3, 4, 7, or 8 of this Article or

G.S. 15A-1321

and to provide liaison and consultation services concerning these matters. These attorneys are subject to Chapter 126 of the General Statutes and shall also perform additional duties as may be assigned by the Attorney General. The attorney employed by the Attorney General in accordance with

G.S. 114-4.2

B shall represent the State’s interest at commitment hearings, rehearings and supplemental hearings held for respondents admitted to the University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill pursuant to Part 3, 4, 7, or 8 of this Article or

G.S. 15A-1321

.

History.

1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 11; 1979, c. 915, s. 12; 1983, c. 275, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 115; 1989, c. 141, s. 12; 1991, c. 257, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 739, s. 12(a); 2000-144, s. 42; 2006-264, s. 61(a).

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-264, s. 61(a), effective October 1, 2006, and applicable to appeals filed on or after that date, in subsection (a) deleted “and on appeals held under this Article” at the end of the third sentence, and added the sixth sentence; and rewrote subsection (e).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Although a minor cannot obtain legal representation without the consent of the legally responsible person, the rights of the child can be adequately protected. First, the Department of Social Services can conduct an investigation of the legally responsible person pursuant to

G.S. 7A-542

et seq. (see now

G.S. 7B-300

et seq.), the guardian ad litem program can provide additional support for abused, neglected, or dependent juveniles, including legal support and, a minor can receive representation for the commitment proceedings by virtue of

G.S. 122C-224.1

and this section. See opinion of Attorney General to C. Robin Britt, Sr., Secretary, Department of Human Resources, — N.C.A.G. — (December 20, 1995).